Maine, session 132, LD1892.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1536, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 398, Pt. ZZZ, §§2 and
3, is further amended to read:
1. Final priority reserves. After the transfers to the State Contingent Account
pursuant to section 1507, the transfers to the Loan Insurance Reserve pursuant to section
1511, the transfers pursuant to section 1522, a transfer of $2,500,000 for the Reserve for
General Fund Operating Capital and, the transfers to the Retiree Health Insurance Internal
Service Fund pursuant to section 1519, a transfer of $35,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-27 and
a transfer of $60,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-28 and in each subsequent fiscal year to the
School Construction Debt Service Fund pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15919, the State
Controller shall transfer at the close of each fiscal year from the unappropriated surplus of
the General Fund an amount equal to the amount available from the unappropriated surplus
after all required deductions of appropriations, budgeted financial commitments and
adjustments considered necessary by the State Controller have been made as follows:
A. Eighty percent to the stabilization fund; and
G. Twenty percent to the Highway and Bridge Capital program, Other Special
Revenue Funds account.
Sec. 2. 8 MRSA §386, sub-§1 is enacted to read:
1. Funds to School Construction Debt Service Fund. Beginning in fiscal year 2026-
27, the first $32,500,000 of revenue received from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and
agents' license fees must be deposited into the School Construction Debt Service Fund
established in Title 20-A, section 15919.
Sec. 3. 8 MRSA §415, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Funds to School Construction Debt Service Fund. Beginning in fiscal year
2026-27, the first $32,500,000 received by the commission pursuant to subsection 1 must
be deposited in the School Construction Debt Service Fund established in Title 20-A,
section 15919.
Sec. 4. 8 MRSA §1036, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 417, §7, is further
amended to read:
1. Distribution for administrative expenses of board. A slot machine operator
licensed under section 1011, subsection 2 or a casino operator that is a commercial track
that was licensed to operate slot machines under section 1011, subsection 2 on January 1,
2011 shall collect and distribute 1% of gross slot machine income to the Treasurer of State
for deposit in the General Fund for the administrative expenses of the board, except that,
beginning in fiscal year 2026-27, the first $5,000,000 of gross slot machine income must
be deposited in the School Construction Debt Service Fund established in Title 20-A,
section 15919.
Sec. 5. 8 MRSA §1218, sub-§1, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 681, Pt. J, §6, is
amended to read:
F. Six and one-half percent of the adjusted gross sports wagering receipts must be
deposited in the General Fund, except that, beginning in fiscal year 2026-27, the first
Page 1 - 132LR0903(01)

412 $5,000,000 of adjusted gross sports wagering receipts must be deposited in the School
423 Construction Debt Service Fund established in Title 20-A, section 15919.
Sec. 6. 20-A MRSA §15919 is enacted to read:
§15919. School construction after July 1, 2026
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2026, school
construction projects and consolidation projects approved by the department and state
board are subject to the following requirements.
1. School Construction Debt Service Fund established. The School Construction
Debt Service Fund, referred to in this section as "the debt service fund," is established as a
dedicated, nonlapsing fund within the department to provide funding for school
construction projects in accordance with this subsection.
A. The debt service fund must be funded up to a minimum of $175,000,000 in fiscal
year 2026-27 and up to a minimum of $200,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-28 and in each
fiscal year thereafter. Funds must be deposited in the debt service fund from the
following sources in the amounts specified:
(1) Thirty-five million dollars in fiscal year 2026-27 and, beginning in fiscal year
2027-28, $60,000,000 per fiscal year from a transfer of the available balance of the
unappropriated surplus of the General Fund at the close of each fiscal year,
pursuant to Title 5, section 1536, subsection 1;
(2) Five million dollars from the amount collected pursuant to Title 8, section
1036, subsection 1;
(3) Ten million dollars per year from revenue received from the adult use cannabis
sales tax, pursuant to Title 36, section 1811, subsection 1, paragraph D,
subparagraph 5;
(4) Five million dollars from the amount collected pursuant to Title 8, section
1218, subsection 1, paragraph F;
(5) Forty million dollars per year from revenue received from the tax imposed on
cigarettes pursuant to Title 36, section 4381;
(6) Ten million dollars per year from revenue received from the tax imposed on
tobacco products pursuant to Title 36, section 4410;
(7) Sixty-five million dollars per year from State Lottery and Tri-state Lotto
revenue, less the costs of administering the lottery and funds set aside for prizes,
pursuant to Title 8, chapters 14-A and 16, respectively;
(8) Five million dollars per year from revenue received from the cannabis excise
tax, pursuant to Title 36, section 4923;
(9) Federal funds received for school construction purposes; and
(10) Any other public or private source.
B. After the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026 and the close of each fiscal
year thereafter, the State Controller shall transfer to the School Construction Debt
Service Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account the unencumbered balances
remaining in the Department of Education, General Purpose Aid for Local Schools,
Page 2 - 132LR0903(01)

412 General Fund account funding sufficient to meet the minimum funding level described
423 in paragraph A if the minimum funding level is not met by the funding sources
434 described in paragraph A, subparagraphs (1) to (10).
C. On an annual basis beginning July 1, 2026, the department shall award $20,000,000
from the debt service fund to fund approved school construction projects from school
administrative units that are proposing significant consolidation of existing school
districts.
2. State and local share. The State shall pay at least 75% of the total cost of the
annual debt service of an approved school construction project. A school administrative
unit shall pay at least 25% of the total cost of a school construction project. The
commissioner may adjust the school administrative unit's percentage based on the school
administrative unit's ability to pay.
3. Environmental standards. All school construction projects must be green-
certified and use the most cost-effective, energy-efficient and low-emission standards
possible.
4. Rulemaking. The state board, in conjunction with the department, may adopt rules
to implement this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive
rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 7. 20-A MRSA §15920 is enacted to read:
§15920. Maine Public School Financing Authority
1. Maine Public School Financing Authority established. The Maine Public School
Financing Authority, referred to in this section as "the authority," is established as a body
corporate and politic and a public instrumentality of the State, and the exercise of the
powers conferred by this section is deemed and held to be the performance of essential
government functions. Beginning July 1, 2026 and each year thereafter, the authority shall
administer:
A. The sale of bonds to school administrative units to support the payment of the local
share of school construction projects; and
B. When feasible, the provision of zero-interest financing or cash allotments for school
construction projects.
2. Powers and duties. The authority may:
A. Borrow money or otherwise obtain credit in the authority's own name;
B. Lend money or otherwise extend credit to any school administrative unit and
exercise all powers of a lender or creditor;
C. Provide or participate in interest rate cap agreements and other agreements
providing school administrative units with protection against interest rate fluctuations;
D. Insure or guarantee performance of any loan agreement or other obligation;
E. Obtain, develop or disseminate any information useful or convenient for carrying
out any purpose or power of the authority;
F. In accordance with the limitations and restrictions of this section, cause any of the
authority's powers or duties to be carried out by one or more nonprofit organizations
Page 3 - 132LR0903(01)

412 exempt from taxation under the provisions of the United States Internal Revenue Code
423 of 1986 and organized, created or operated under the laws of this State;
G. Obtain any certification, warranty, affidavit or other representation necessary or
useful for carrying out any of the authority's powers or duties;
H. Employ persons, including private legal counsel and financial experts, on either a
temporary or permanent basis, in order to carry out any of the authority's powers and
duties. Employees of the authority are not subject to the provisions of Title 5, chapters
71 and 372;
I. Sue or initiate or appear in any proceeding. The authority may be sued in accordance
with Title 1, section 409; Title 5, chapter 375; or Title 14, chapter 741;
J. Maintain an office at a place designated by the authority within the State;
K. Adopt an official seal and alter it at the authority's pleasure;
L. Pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375, adopt any rule, including its bylaws, necessary or
useful for carrying out any of the authority's duties;
M. Receive and accept from any source allocations, appropriations, loans, grants and
contributions of money or other things of value to be held, used or applied to carry out
this chapter, subject to the conditions upon which the loans, grants and contributions
may be made, including, but not limited to, appropriations, allocations, loans, grants or
gifts from any federal agency or governmental subdivision of the State and its agencies;
N. Invest funds received from any source for carrying out this section and expend
interest earnings on those funds as appropriate to implement this section, including use
for program and administrative costs;
O. Make, modify and carry out any agreement necessary or useful for carrying out any
of the authority's powers, duties or purposes, including, without limitation, any
construction agreement, purchase or acquisition agreement, loan or lease agreement,
partnership agreement, limited partnership agreement, joint venture agreement,
participation agreement or agreement with leasing corporations or other financial
intermediaries; and
P. Do any act or thing necessary or useful for carrying out any of the authority's
powers, duties or purposes.
3. Chief executive officer. The chief executive officer is the chief administrative
officer of the authority and must be appointed by the Governor, subject to review by the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters and
to confirmation by the Legislature. The chief executive officer shall supervise the
administrative affairs and technical activities of the authority in accordance with the rules
and policies of the authority. The chief executive officer shall, in the name of and on behalf
of the authority:
A. In accordance with procedures of the authority, employ the directors of any
divisions established by the authority. The directors serve at the pleasure of the chief
executive officer;
Page 4 - 132LR0903(01)

B. In accordance with procedures of the authority, employ professional and
nonprofessional personnel, including private legal counsel and financial experts, of the
authority. The personnel shall serve at the pleasure of the chief executive officer;
C. Provide for the sharing of personnel among any divisions and the authority and
provide for the coordination of administration of common projects and programs;
D. Approve all accounts for salaries, per diems, allowable expenses of the authority,
or of any employee of or consultant to the authority, and expenses incidental to the
operation of the authority; and
E. Perform other duties directed by action of the members of the authority in carrying
out the purposes of this section.
4. Conflicts of interest. Notwithstanding Title 5, section 18, subsection 1, paragraph
B, each member of the authority and each employee, contractor, agent or other
representative of the authority is deemed an executive employee solely for purposes of Title
5, section 18 and for no other purpose, except that the chief executive officer is also deemed
an executive employee for purposes of Title 5, section 19. Title 17, section 3104 does not
apply to a representative under this subsection.
5. Annual report; audit. The authority shall annually submit to the President of the
Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Governor and the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters, no later than 120
days after the close of the authority's fiscal year, a complete report on the activities of the
authority. The report must include the following:
A. A description of the authority's operations;
B. An accounting of its receipts and expenditures, assets and liabilities at the end of
the authority's fiscal year;
C. A schedule for the bonds and notes outstanding at the end of the authority's fiscal
year and a statement of the amounts redeemed and issued during the authority's fiscal
year, including a report on the authority's reserve funds;
D. A statement of the authority's proposed and projected activities for the ensuing year;
and
E. Recommendations as to further actions that may be suitable for achieving the
purposes of this section.
The authority shall provide the Treasurer of State, within 120 days after the close of the
fiscal year, the annual financial report certified by an independent certified public
accountant, who may be the accountant or a member of the firm of accountants who
regularly audits the books and accounts of the authority, selected by the authority. The
authority is also subject to the provisions of Title 5, chapter 11. The authority may combine
for accounting purposes any or all funds established for its programs and activities.
6. Taxation and fees. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, revenue
obligation securities of the authority are declared to be issued for an essential public and
governmental purpose and to be public instruments and, together with interest and income,
including the profit made from the securities' transfer or sale, are exempt from taxation
within the State.
Page 5 - 132LR0903(01)

Sec. 8. 36 MRSA §1818, as amended by PL 2021, c. 645, §5 and amended by c.
669, §5, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
§1818. Tax on adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products
All sales tax revenue collected pursuant to section 1811 on the sale of adult use
cannabis and adult use cannabis products must be deposited into the General Fund, except
that:
1. Funds to Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in
Fund. On or before the last day of each month, the State Controller shall transfer 12% of
the sales tax revenue received by the assessor during the preceding month pursuant to
section 1811 to the Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in
Fund established under Title 28‑B, section 1101; and
2. Funds to School Construction Debt Service Fund. Beginning in fiscal year
2026-27, and annually thereafter, after the adjustment in subsection 1, paragraph A, the
first $10,000,000 must be deposited in the School Construction Debt Service fund
established in Title 20-A, section 15919.
Sec. 9. 36 MRSA §4381 is amended to read:
§4381. Tax credited to General Fund
The revenue derived from the tax imposed by this chapter shall must be credited to the
General Fund of the State, except that beginning in fiscal year 2026-27, the first
$40,000,000 must be deposited in the School Construction Debt Service Fund established
in Title 20-A, section 15919.
Sec. 10. 36 MRSA §4410 is enacted to read:
§4410. Tax credited to General Fund
The revenue derived from the tax imposed by this chapter must be credited to the
General Fund of the State, except that beginning in fiscal year 2026-27, the first
$10,000,000 must be deposited in the School Construction Debt Service Fund established
in Title 20-A, section 15919.
Sec. 11. 36 MRSA §4925, as amended by PL 2021, c. 645, §6 and amended by c.
669, §5, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
§4925. Application of excise tax revenue
All excise tax revenue collected by the assessor pursuant to this chapter on the sale of
adult use cannabis must be deposited into the General Fund, except that:
1. Funds to Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in
Fund. On or before the last day of each month, the assessor shall transfer 12% of the excise
tax revenue received during the preceding month pursuant to this chapter to the Adult Use
Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund established in Title 28‑B,
section 1101; and
2. Funds to School Construction Debt Service Fund. Beginning in fiscal year
2026-27, and annually thereafter, after the adjustment in subsection 1, paragraph A, the
first $5,000,000 must be deposited in the School Construction Debt Service Fund
established in Title 20-A, section 15919.
Page 6 - 132LR0903(01)

Sec. 12. Transfer to Maine Public School Financing Authority.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer
$100,000,000 from the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund established by the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 5, section 1532 to the Maine Public School Financing Authority, Other
Special Revenue Funds account no later than July 1, 2026.